District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.28

Income application in determining need for family receiving more than 1 assistance payment.

When a family is receiving more than 1 assistance payment and members of a family have income, the Mayor shall apply income that must be considered in determining need as follows:

(1)

When a husband and wife are each receiving assistance, income shall be divided equally between them.

(2)

When the parent of minor children has income and is receiving assistance in his or her own right, his or her income shall be prorated between his or her payment and the payment for his or her dependents.

(3)

When an adult child has income, is receiving assistance, and is living with his or her family which is receiving assistance, his or her income shall be applied only to his or her own requirements.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 528, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.28.